src-fst-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
*Nouns 49 ner examples:*
* *manner:* `manner+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # continent)
* *mantere:* `manner+N+Sg+Nom`
* *manterena:* `manner+N+Sg+Ess`
* *mantereena:* `manner+N+Sg+Ess`


*Nouns 49 nar examples:*
* *piennar:* `piennar+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # curb)
* *pientare:* `piennar+N+Sg+Nom`
* *pientarena:* `piennar+N+Sg+Ess`
* *pientareena:* `piennar+N+Sg+Ess`


*Nouns 49 auer examples:*
* *auer:* `auer+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # morning mist)
* *autere:* `auer+N+Sg+Nom`
* *auterena:* `auer+N+Sg+Ess`
* *autereena:* `auer+N+Sg+Ess`

### Exceptions to dictionary inflection
There are few cases where dictionaries traditionally have never indicated
correct inflection by classification. In computational implementation we
need to assign some classes or exceptional paths to them, and they are
described here.

Two words have exceptions in their vowel harmony patterns:

*Nouns veri examples:*
* *veri:* `veri+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # blood)
* *verta:* `veri+N+Sg+Par`
* ★*vertä:* `veri+N+Sg+Par` (is not standard language)


*Nouns meri examples:*
* *meri:* `meri+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # sea)
* *merta:* `meri+N+Sg+Par`
* ★*mertä:* `meri+N+Sg+Par` (is not standard language)



*Noun uros examples:*
* *uros:* `uros+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # male)
* *uroksen:* `uros+N+Sg+Gen`
* *uroon:* `uros+N+Sg+Gen`

It is not noted anywhere that the common inflection pattern for veli is
exceptional:


*Noun veli examples:*
* *veli:* `veli+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # brother)
* *veljeä:* `veli+N+Sg+Par`
* *veljen:* `veli+N+Sg+Gen`

A few of ika-final nouns, but not all, have the shifting half vowel
written as j in normative orthography.


*Nouns aika examples:*
* *aika:* `aika+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # time)
* *ajassa:* `aika+N+Sg+Ine`


*Nouns poika examples:*
* *poika:* `poika+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # boy)
* *pojassa:* `poika+N+Sg+Ine`

### Noun forms of numerals with special inflection
The numerals are not really nouns in this morphology, for details see
[numeral-stems], but some of their compounds are nouns, and the following
classes are for those that have special stem or suffix patterns not
available with other nouns.
The numerals 1 and 2 are in paradigm that is currently left with one other
noun, _haaksi_, so nominals with 2 go to that class but 1 gets a new class
for being front vowelled. 3 Has its own paradigm, 4 is like koira, 5
like hiisi and 6 like kausi.
The numerals 7, 8, 9 have their own paradigm, which, other than the
nominative having extra n at the end, is same as the tri-syllabic
a, ä stems, similarly 10 is quite like sisar with the extra en in nominative.


*Nouns from numerals yksi examples:*
* *aamuyksi:* `aamuyksi+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. 1 a.m.)
* *aamuyhtä:* `aamuyksi+N+Sg+Par`
* *aamuyhtenä:* `aamuyksi+N+Sg+Ess`


*Nouns from numerals kolme examples:*
* *aamukolme:* `aamukolme+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. 3 a.m.)
* *aamukolmea:* `aamukolme+N+Sg+Par`
* *aamukolmeen:* `aamukolme+N+Sg+Ill`
* *aamukolmia:* `aamukolme+N+Pl+Par`
* *aamukolmien:* `aamukolme+N+Pl+Gen`
* *aamukolmiin:* `aamukolme+N+Pl+Ill`



*Nouns from numerals 8 examples:*
* *aamukahdeksan:* `aamukahdeksan+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. 8 a.m.)
* *aamukahdeksaa:* `aamukahdeksan+N+Sg+Par`
* *aamukahdeksana:* `aamukahdeksan+N+Sg+Ess`
* *aamukahdeksassa:* `aamukahdeksan+N+Sg+Ine`
* *aamukahdeksina:* `aamukahdeksan+N+Pl+Ess`
* *aamukahdeksien:* `aamukahdeksan+N+Pl+Gen`
* *aamukahdeksiin:* `aamukahdeksan+N+Pl+Ill`


*Nouns from numerals 9 examples:*
* *aamuyhdeksän:* `aamuyhdeksän+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. 9 a.m.)
* *aamuyhdeksää:* `aamuyhdeksän+N+Sg+Par`
* *aamuyhdeksänä:* `aamuyhdeksän+N+Sg+Ess`
* *aamuyhdeksässä:* `aamuyhdeksän+N+Sg+Ine`
* *aamuyhdeksinä:* `aamuyhdeksän+N+Pl+Ess`
* *aamuyhdeksien:* `aamuyhdeksän+N+Pl+Gen`
* *aamuyhdeksiin:* `aamuyhdeksän+N+Pl+Ill`



*Nouns from numerals 10 examples:*
* *aamukymmenen:* `aamukymmenen+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. 10 a.m.)


*Nouns from numerals 1000 examples:*
* *vuosituhat:* `vuosituhat+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # millennium)
* *vuosituhantena:* `vuosituhat+N+Sg+Ess`




















































































































### Plurales tantum
For some words, the singular forms are rare, odd, or even deemed
ungrammatical, these words have separate classes for them. In Finnish
words to commonly be in this class are events like häät (wedding),
juhlat (party), etc. then all things that are semantically coupled,
like clothes with two somethings (as with English): farkut (jeans),
housut (pants). It is noteworthy, that sometimes dictionaries classify
common words as plurale tantum for semantic reasons: joukot (troops)
versus joukko (group). We don’t need that at this point.
The compounds of plurale tantum words are made from singular forms:
farkkukangas (jean fabric), hääjuhla (wedding party).


*Noun 1o plurt examples:*
* *aivot:* `aivot+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # brains)
* ★*aivo:* `aivot+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun 1y plurt examples:*
* *pöksyt:* `pöksyt+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # pants)
* ★*pöksy:* `pöksyt+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun 1u plurt examples:*
* *housut:* `housut+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # pants)
* ★*housu:* `housut+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun 1ko plurt examples:*
* *huoltojoukot:* `huolto#joukot+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # troops)
* ★*huoltojoukko:* `huolto#joukot+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun 1ku plurt examples:*
* *farkut:* `farkut+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # jeans)
* ★*farkku:* `farkut+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)



*Noun 1dot plurt examples:*
* *perustiedot:* `perus#tiedot+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. knowledge (in school grades))
* ★*perustieto:* `perus#tiedot+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun 1töt plurt examples:*
* *kaksostytöt:* `kaksos#tytöt+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. girls ?)
* ★*kaksostyttö:* `kaksos#tytöt+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun 1ot plurt examples:*
* *pidot:* `pidot+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # bacchanalia)
* ★*pito:* `pidot+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun 1vut plurt examples:*
* *ravut:* `ravut+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. crabs ??)
* ★*rapu:* `ravut+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun 1ut plurt examples:*
* *urut:* `urut+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # organs)
* ★*urku:* `urut+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun 1put plurt examples:*
* *raput:* `raput+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # stairs)
* ★*rappu:* `raput+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun 1dyt plurt examples:*
* *käädyt:* `käädyt+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # necklace)
* ★*kääty:* `käädyt+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun 1lot plurt examples:*
* *aallot:* `aallot+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # waves)
* ★*aalto:* `aallot+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun 1not plurt examples:*
* *opinnot:* `opinnot+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # studies)
* ★*opinto:* `opinnot+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun 2iot plurt examples:*
* *rauniot:* `rauniot+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # ruins)
* ★*raunio:* `rauniot+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)



*Noun 3iot plurt examples:*
* *pippalot:* `pippalot+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # party)
* ★*pippalo:* `pippalot+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun 3lut plurt examples:*
* *neuvottelut:* `neuvottelut+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # negotiation)
* ★*neuvottelu:* `neuvottelut+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun 1nöt plurt examples:*
* *säännöt:* `säännöt+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # rules)
* ★*sääntö:* `säännöt+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun 7 back t~n plurt examples:*
* *tunnit:* `tunnit+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # classes)
* ★*tunti:* `tunnit+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun xxx a front k0 plurt examples:*
* *sukat:* `sukat+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # socks)
* ★*sukka:* `sukat+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun xxx a front kg plurt examples:*
* *kengät:* `kengät+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # shoes)
* ★*kenkä:* `kengät+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun 8 plurt examples:*
* *ravet:* `ravet+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # rave)
* ★*rave:* `ravet+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun 8  front  plurt examples:*
* *bänet:* `bänet+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # breakup)
* ★*bäne:* `bänet+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun xxx a front plurt examples:*
* *markkinat:* `markkinat+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # market)
* ★*markkina:* `markkinat+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun xxx a front pp plurt examples:*
* *hipat:* `hipat+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # party)
* ★*hippa:* `hipat+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun xxx a back p plurt examples:*
* *kuopat:* `kuopat+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. holes ?)
* ★*kuoppa:* `kuopat+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun xxx dat plurt examples:*
* *raudat:* `raudat+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # irons)
* ★*rauta:* `raudat+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun xxx vat plurt examples:*
* *tavat:* `tavat+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # manners)
* ★*tapa:* `tavat+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun xxx lat plurt examples:*
* ★*vallat:* `vallat+N+Pl+Nom` (is not standard language # states)
* *valta:* `vallat+N+Sg+Nom`


*Noun xxx rrt plurt examples:*
* *varat:* `varat+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # budget)
* ★*vara:* `varat+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun xxx t plurt examples:*
* *juhlat:* `juhlat+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # party)
* ★*juhla:* `juhlat+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun xxxihi t plurt examples:*
* *kiharat:* `kiharat+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # curls)
* ★*kihara:* `kiharat+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)

* *käräjät:* `käräjät+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # court)

* *käräjät:* `käräjät+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # court)


*Nounäjäm xxx t plurt examples:*
* ★*käräjä:* `käräjät+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun xxx kAt plurt examples:*
* *paikat:* `paikat+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. body parts)
* ★*paikka:* `paikat+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun 14 kat plurt examples:*
* *silakat:* `silakat+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. kinds of a fish)
* ★*silakka:* `silakat+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun 14 kat2 plurt examples:*
* *rintsikat:* `rintsikat+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # bra)
* ★*rintsikka:* `rintsikat+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun xxx teet plurt examples:*
* *tieteet:* `tieteet+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # sciences)
* ★*tiede:* `tieteet+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)

*Noun xxx t plurt examples:*


*Noun xxx it plurt examples:*
* *farmarit:* `farmarit+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # jeans)
* ★*farmari:* `farmarit+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun xxx tit plurt examples:*
* *kastanjetit:* `kastanjetit+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. kind of an instrumemt)
* ★*kastanjetti:* `kastanjetit+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun xxx dit plurt examples:*
* *taudit:* `taudit+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. diseases)
* ★*tauti:* `taudit+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun xxx dit front plurt examples:*
* *pihdit:* `pihdit+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # jaws)
* ★*pihti:* `pihdit+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun xxx git plurt examples:*
* *tongit:* `tongit+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # pliers)
* ★*tonki:* `tongit+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun xxx git fornt plurt examples:*
* *syömingit:* `syömingit+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. eating party)
* ★*syöminki:* `syöminki+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun xxx get plurt examples:*
* *länget:* `länget+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. some cowboy accessory thing)
* ★*länki:* `länget+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun xxx sit plurt examples:*
* *lasit:* `lasit+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # glasses)
* ★*lasi:* `lasit+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)



*Noun xxx nit plurt examples:*
* *bikinit:* `bikinit+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # bikini)
* ★*bikini:* `bikinit+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun xxx iiiit plurt examples:*
* *liivit:* `liivit+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # vest)
* ★*liivi:* `liivit+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun xxx eat plurt examples:*
* *hopeat:* `hopeat+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. cutlery (silvers))
* ★*hopea:* `hopeat+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun 15 tiet plurt examples:*
* *tiet:* `tiet+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # roads)
* ★*tie:* `tiet+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun xxx työt plurt examples:*
* *työt:* `työt+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # employment)
* ★*työ:* `työt+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)


*Noun xxx matt plurt examples:*
* *vanhemmat:* `vanhemmat+N+Pl+Nom` (Eng. # parents)
* ★*vanhempi:* `vanhemmat+N+Sg+Nom` (is not standard language)
